Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.105

Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, hold for sale, label, identify, represent, or to advertise any planting stock as being certified, registered, foundation, or breeder planting stock unless it complies with the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 1999 c 144 s 11; 1961 c 83 s 14. Formerly RCW 15.14.140.]